Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201575-331
Transportation Network Company Regulation Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Transportation Network Company Regulation Cash Fund is created. The commission shall use the fund to regulate transportation network companies and enforce sections 75-323 to 75-343 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission under such sections. The fund shall contain the fees remitted pursuant to section 75-305. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 10.
May 28, 2015
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.